New York, session 2025-2026, S7187.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subparagraph 1 of paragraph (b) of subdivision 4 of section 2 214 of the elder law is amended to read as follows: 3 (1) within the amounts appropriated therefor, counties having an 4 approved county plan shall be eligible for reimbursement by the state 5 for expenditures for approved community service projects pursuant to 6 this section. Such state reimbursement shall not exceed thirty-three 7 thousand six hundred dollars or four dollars twenty cents for each 8 elderly person residing in the county, whichever is greater. The annual 9 state reimbursement eligibility of the total annual expenditures for 10 such approved programs shall be proportional to such county's share of 11 elderly persons living in the state, and shall be at a rate [of] that is 12 no less than seventy-five percent of the total annual expenditures for 13 such approved programs. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 15 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11456-01-5